Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 10. Grizzly Bear Relocation

§ 23-1-1001.
Grizzly bear relocation.

Upon relocating a grizzly bear or upon receiving notification that a grizzly bear is being relocated, the department shall provide notification to the county sheriff of the county to which the bear is relocated within five (5) days of each grizzly bear relocation and shall issue a press release to the media and sheriff in the county where each grizzly bear is relocated.

The notice and press release shall provide the following information:

The date of the grizzly bear relocation;

The number of grizzly bears relocated; and

The location of the grizzly bear relocation, as provided by commission rule and regulation.

No later than January 15 of each year the department shall submit an annual report to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee. The annual report shall include the total number and relocation area of each grizzly bear relocated during the previous calendar year. The department shall also make available the annual report to the public.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 86, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 86, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.